src/phonology/liv-phon.twolc
"u:0 in second position of first-syllable diphthong"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
u:0 <=> # Cns:* [ õ: | ȭ: | ä: | o: ]  _ Cns:+ ( Vow: ) %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!!€# ouki%^VowsLI1z
!!€0 ō0ki0z
         Vow: _ v Vow: %^ConsSh: ;
!!€# pǟuva%^ConsSh
!!€0 pǟ0va0

"o:0 in second position of first-syllable diphthong"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
!! {{{
o:0 <=> # Cns:* [ ū: ]  _ Cns:+ (0:Cns) (Vow:) [ %^Stress1to2:0 ] ;
!!€# pūol0a%^Stress1to2%^ConsL
!!€# pȯ0llõ00
!! }}}

!! !Zero to vowel

"0:e in vowel raising kēļ"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
0:e <=> Cns* ē: _ Cns %^Ē2ĪE: ;
!!€# kē0l%^Ē2ĪE
!!€0 kīel0

"0:õ in vowel metathesis"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
0:õ <=> [ b | d | t | g ] _ [ l | r ] õ: %^VowsMetath:0 %^VowsRM:0  ;


!! !!Consonant rules

!! !Consonant loss 
"shorten consonantism between 1st and 2nd vowel center jeʼllõ:jelāb"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 Cx:0 <=> 
# Cns* Vow: ( ʼ: ) Cx _ Vow: Dummy:* %^ConsSh:0  ;
          where Cx in ( b g l ļ m n ņ r ŗ v ž ) ;
!!€# aʼmmā%^PalatalizeLeft%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ži
!!€0 äʼm000000ži

"z:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 z:0 <=>
# Cns* Vow ( ʼ: ) z _ Vow: ( %^StodRM:0 ) %^ConsSh:0  ;
  _ (%^Stress2to1:|%^StodRM:) (%^VowsRM:) %^ConsRM: ;
!!€  rik0āz%^Stress2to1%^ConsRM
!0  rikkõ000

!! !Consonant lengthening

!! Lengthening consonantism between first and second vowel center
!! simultaneous to reducing vowel of second syllable

! jelāb:jellõ
"lengthen consonantism between 1st and 2nd vowel center jelāb: jellõ"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 0:Cx <=> 
 # Cns* Vow:+ ( ʼ: ) Cx _ Vow: (Cns:) [ %^VowShIn1: (%^A2ÕIn2: ) | ( %^Stress1to2:0 ) %^ConsL:0 | %^Stress2to1:0 ] ;
! # Cns* Vow: (o:) ( ʼ: ) Cx _ Vow: (Cns:) [ ( %^Stress1to2:0 ) %^ConsL:0 | %^Stress2to1:0 ] ;
 # Cns* Vow ( ʼ: ) Cx _ [ %^ConsL:0 ] ;
! Cx _ Vow: %^ConsL:0  [ # | %> | %^VowsRM:0 %> :Vow ] ;
! Cx _ Vow: %^Stress2to1:0 [ # | %> | %^VowsRM:0 %> :Vow ] ;
          where Cx in ( t k b d g l ļ m n ņ r ŗ š v z ž ) ;
!!€  je0l0ā%^Stress2to1
!0  jeʼllõ0
!!€  ka0l0ā%^Stress2to1
!0  kaʼllõ0
!!€  rik0āz%^Stress2to1%^ConsRM
!0  rikkõ000
!!€# pūol0a%^Stress1to2%^ConsL
!!€# pȯ0llõ00

"0:p"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 0:p <=> Vow: p _ Vow: %^ConsL: ;
!!€# käp0ā%^ConsL%^LongV2Õin2
!!€0 käppõ00

"%{XC%}:Cx"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{XC%}:Cx <=> 
!# Cns* Vow ( ʼ: ) Cx _ Vow: [ ( %^Stress1to2:0 ) %^ConsL:0 | %^Stress2to1:0 ] 
               Cx _ ;
!  # Cns* [ a | ä | e | õ | u | i ] ( ʼ: ) Cx _ [ %> õ | %> i ] ;
         where Cx in (t b d g l ļ m n ņ r ŗ š v z ) ;

"%{XC%}:p"
!! __@RULENAME@__ 2014-02-27
 %{XC%}:p <=> p _ %> ;
!!€# kep%{XC%}>õ
!!€0 kepp0õ

"%{XC%}:ž"
!! __@RULENAME@__ 2014-02-27
 %{XC%}:ž <=>
  # Cns* [ a | ä | õ | u | i | e ] ( ʼ: ) :ž (%^D2Ž:) _ [ %> õ |  %> i ] ;
! :ž _ %> ;
!!€# veʼd%^D2Ž%{XC%}>i
!!€0 veʼž0ž0i

!"%{XC%}:š"
!!! __@RULENAME@__ 2014-01-18 "%{XC%}:Cx" not working
! %{XC%}:š <=> š _ %> ;

"%{XC%}:k"
!! __@RULENAME@__ 2014-02-27
 %{XC%}:k <=> k _ %> ;
!!€# rok%{XC%}>õ
!!€0 rokk0õ

"Stod removal left"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 ʼ:0 <= _ \[ .#. ]* %^StodRM:0 ;
!  # Cns* :0* Vow _ [ CnsWithStod Cns:* [ :0* | Vow: z: ]| [ i | u ] g (Vow: Cns:) | o Cns ] ( Vow: | ū: Cns: ) %^StodRM:0 ; 
!!€# daʼdzā%^Stress1to2%^VowsRM%>õ
!!€0 daʼdz0000õ

"Stod removal right"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 ʼ:0 =>  _ \[ .#. ]* %^StodRM:0 ;
!# Cns* :0* Vow _ [ CnsWithStod Cns:* :0* | [ i | u ] g (Vow: Cns:) | o Cns ] (Vow: | ū: Cns: ) %^StodRM:0 ; 
! 2013-06-26 for looser voikko stød can disappear everywhere 
! _ ; a filter does this removal 2015-06-17

! Vow _ CnsWithStod: ( :CnsWithStod )  Vow: %^Stress2to1:0 [ # | %> | %^VowsRM:0  %> ] ;
!# Cns* :Vow _ :CnsWithStod+  Vow: %^Stress2to1:0 [ # | %> | %^VowsRM:0  %> ] ;
!!€# ka0l0ā%^Stress2to1
!!€0 kaʼllõ0

!# Cns* Vow ( 0: ) :Cns+ _ %^Stress2to1:0 [ # | %> ] ;
!# Cns* :Vow _  CnsStrengthening Vow: %^Stress2to1:0  [ # | %> | %^VowsRM:0  %> ] ;
!         # Cns* :Vow _ [ g: | d: | l: ] Vow: %^Stress2to1:0 %^VowsRM:0  %^ConsRM:0  ;
!         # Cns* :Vow _ [ g: | d: | l: ] Vow: %^Stress2to1:0 %^VowsRM:0 %> [ ḑ i | ž i | š t i ] ;

"z:ž"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 z:ž <=> _ (Vow:0) %^PalatalizeLeft:0 ; !! 
!!€# alīz%^PalatalizeLeft%>i
!!€0 alīž00i
!!€# izā%^PalatalizeLeft%^VowsRM%>ḑi
!!€# iž0000ḑi

"l:ļ"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
l:ļ <=> _ Vow: (%^Stress2to1:0) %^VowsRM:0 ( %^ConsRM:0 ) %> [ ḑ i | ž i | š t i ] ;
        _ m Vow: (%^Stress1to2:) %^PalatalizeLeft:0 ( %^VowsRM:0 ) [ # | %> ] ;
!! This rule should not require the %^ConsRM:0 trigger, but for now this makes it work.
	_ (%^StodRM:) %^PalatalizeLeft:0 ; !! kēļ:kēl 215
!!€# äʼddõl%^PalatalizeLeft%>i
!!€0 äʼddiļ00i
!!€# tuʼl%^StodRM%^PalatalizeLeft%>īž
!!€# tu0ļ000īž

"n:ņ palatalization"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
n:ņ <=> _ ( Vow: ) (%^VowsSh1:) %^PalatalizeLeft:0 ( %^VowsRM:0 | %^Vow2Iin2:) [ # | %> ] ;
!!€# Vē0na%^PalatalizeLeft%^VowsRMõ
!!€0 Vein000õ
!!€# ǭʼrõn%^PalatalizeLeft
!!€0 ǭʼriņ0
       _ t s: Vow: %^VowShIn1: %^PalatalizeLeft: ;
!!€# vȱntsa%^VowShIn1%^PalatalizeLeft%^VowsRM%>ti
!!€0 vȯņtš00000ti
        _ %^PalatalizeLeft:0 ; !! sēņ:sēn 220
       _ g ( Vow: ) (%^VowShIn1:) %^PalatalizeLeft: ;
!!€# kǟnga%^VowShIn1%^PalatalizeLeft%^VowsRMi
!!€0 keņg0000i
   

"r:ŗ"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
r:ŗ <=> _ %^PalatalizeLeft:0 ; !! jūŗ:jūr 221
       _ g ( Vow: ) ( %^VowShIn1: ) %^PalatalizeLeft: ;
!!€# ǟrga%^VowShIn1%^PalatalizeLeft%^VowsRMi
!!€0 eŗg0000i


! First syllable short second syllable long
! jellõ: jelāb
!"shorten first syllable jellõ: jelāb"
! Cx:0 <=> Cx _ %^1Sh2L:0 ;
!          Cx _ %^ConsRM:0 ;
!          where Cx in ( d g l ļ n p ŗ ) ;

"d:t "
!! __@RULENAME@__  
d:t <=>
       Vow: ( ʼ: | :ʼ ) [ s k: | d d: | t t: | k k:  | t s | n d | ŗ š t: | r t: | 0:u [ t: | d ] ] (Vow:) ( %^ConsSh:0 |%^Stress1to2:) %^VowsRM:0 ( %^ConsRM:0 ) %> _ õ d ;
!!€# kittõ%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>dõd
!!€0 kit00000tõd
       [ ž | :z | :s | :š ] %> _ ; !! nominative plural 
       _ (%^PreI:) (%^StodRM:) %^D2T:  ;
!!€# v0eʼd%^PreI%^StodRM%^D2T
!!€0 vie0t

"d:ț "
!! __@RULENAME@__  
d:ț <=> [ ț: ] Vow: ( %^ConsSh:0 ) %^VowsRM:0  ( %^ConsRM:0 ) %> _ õ d ;

"d:ž "
!! __@RULENAME@__  
d:ž <=>
       :Vow ( ʼ: | :ʼ ) Cns:* _ (%^PreI:) (%^StodRM:) (%^VowsLI1:) %^D2Ž:0 ;

!"ž:d "
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! ž:d <=>
!       :Vow Cns:* _ (%^VowsLI1:|%^StodRM) %^Ž2D:0 ;



!! !Consonant loss

"d:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
d:0 <=>
     Vow: (Cns:+)  _ (%^PreI: %^StodRM:|%^VowsLI1:) %^D2ZERO:0 ;  !!= @CODE@ 
      Cns* Vow ( ʼ: ) d _ Vow: ( %^StodRM:0 ) %^ConsSh:0  ;

"t:0"
!! __T loss before subsequent morpheme with underlying initial d__  
t:0 <=>
    [ Cns:+ | Vow: 0:u ] _ Vow: ( %^Stress1to2:0 ) %^VowsRM:0 ( %^ConsRM:0 ) %> d: õ d ;
    # Cns* Vow ( ʼ: ) t _ Vow: ( %^StodRM:0 ) %^ConsSh:0  ;
!!€# kittõ%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>dõd
!!€0 kit00000tõd

"k:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
k:0 <=> s _ Vow: ( %^ConsSh:0 ) %^VowsRM:0 ( %^ConsRM:0 ) %> d: õ d ;
       # Cns* Vow ( ʼ: ) k _ Vow: ( %^StodRM:0 ) %^ConsSh:0  ;
!!€# rikkā%^ConsSh%^Vow2Iin2di
!!€0 rik0ī00di

"ț:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
ț:0 <=> k _ Vow: ( %^ConsSh:0 ) %^VowsRM:0 ( %^ConsRM:0 ) %> d: õ d ;

"s:š palatalization"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
s:š <=> _ %^PalatalizeLeft:0 [ # | %> ] ;
       _ (t) Vow: Dummy:*  %^PalatalizeLeft:0   ;
!!€# liestā%^VowShIn1%^PalatalizeLeft%^VowsRM%>i
!!€0 l0ešt00000i
        # Cns* ȯ:  0: i: _ Cns:* (Vow:) %^VowsLI1:0 ;
!!€# pȯ0is%^VowsLI1õd
!!€0 pūo0š0õd

"ǟ:ē palatalization"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
ǟ:ē <=> _ %^PalatalizeLeft:0 [ # | %> ] ;

"ǟ:e short and palatalization"
!! __@RULENAME@__
ǟ:e <=> # Cns* _ Cns:+ ( Vow: ) %^VowShIn1: %^PalatalizeLeft: ;
!!€# kǟnga%^VowShIn1%^PalatalizeLeft%^VowsRMi
!!€0 keņg0000i


"a:ä palatalization"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
a:ä <=> # Cns*  _ ( 0: | ʼ: ) [p:|m:]+ [%^PalatalizeLeft:0 | Vow: %^PalatalizeLeft:0 (%^ConsSh:) %^VowsRM: ] [ # | %> ] ;

!!€# aʼmā%^PalatalizeLeft%^ConsSh%^VowsRM%>ḑi
!!€# äʼm00000ḑi
